Tennessee statutes. Title 46 Cemeteries
Chapter 7

Trusts for Perpetual Care of Private Cemeteries

46-7-101. Legislative intent.

The general assembly recognizes that the operation of a cemetery is a public purpose and further recognizes that the proper maintenance of a cemetery or burial grounds, whether private or public, is in the interest of the public health and safety serving a valid public purpose.

A trust created for the perpetual care or improvement of a cemetery or graves lessens the burden of government and, therefore, is found and declared to be a charitable trust. To that end, the general assembly declares its support for the establishment and formation of a trust corporation to act as trustee of a charitable trust for the perpetual care of private cemeteries.

Acts 1989, ch. 222, § 1.

46-7-102. Cemetery trust corporation — Purpose, powers, exemptions — Charter and capital stock.

A trust corporation, which shall be chartered as a not-for-profit general welfare corporation under the laws of Tennessee, may be formed for the sole purpose of administering and providing fiduciary services for a trust created for the perpetual care of a private cemetery, thereby benefiting all the citizens of this state.

The services performed by a trust corporation formed under this chapter are necessarily services not otherwise generally available for such purposes, and the commissioner of financial institutions shall exempt the corporation from any requirement of title 45, chapters 1 and 2, or the rules of the department of financial institutions, that would threaten the viability of the corporation, including, but not limited to, capitalization requirements, fees, and procedures that are not essential to the protection of the interests of the trust beneficiaries.

The trust corporation shall file its charter with the secretary of state and shall also record its charter in the office of the register of deeds in the county in which its principal office is located. The trust corporation's existence shall continue until terminated by law.

It is not the purpose of the corporation to engage in commercial banking activity or private fiduciary activity, except to the limited extent of acting in a fiduciary capacity for a person who creates a trust for the perpetual care of a private cemetery and specifically designates a trust corporation formed under this chapter to serve in the capacity as trustee.

A trust corporation formed under this chapter must use the word “cemetery” in its corporate title and may not advertise its services in such a manner as to represent that the corporation is a general fiduciary trust company.

In addition to the general duties and powers of corporations formed under the laws of Tennessee, a trust corporation formed under this chapter is authorized to:

Accept funds and gifts of land for the benefit of the trust;

Enter into contracts, trust agreements, and other fiduciary instruments;

Adopt, use and display a corporate seal;

Adopt and amend bylaws, rules and regulations for carrying out the purpose of this chapter;

Manage and invest money and other property for the benefit of the trust;

Act in a fiduciary capacity for a person creating a trust for the perpetual care of a private cemetery who specifically designates the trust corporation to act as trustee; and

Have such powers as are necessary and convenient to carry out the purpose for which the trust corporation is organized, including, but not limited to, any necessary and appropriate actions to associate with or participate in transactions through the federal reserve system.

As the trust corporation is formed for a valid public purpose and will exercise its powers for the benefit of the state, the trust corporation, its capital stock, all properties at any time owned or held by it in a fiduciary capacity, and income derived from the trust funds shall be exempt from taxation by the state or any local unit, or subdivision or instrumentality of the state.

Any capital stock of the trust corporation shall be held by the members of the board of directors and their successors in office, by virtue of their incumbency in office.

Acts 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 2011, ch. 490, § 1.

46-7-103. Board of directors — Administration — Investments.

The trust corporation shall have a board of directors as provided in the document that creates the trust to be administered by the corporation. The board shall also serve as trustee of the trust. The directors and their successors shall be appointed in the manner provided in the document.

The trust document shall also provide for the administration and maintenance of the trust funds and the manner in which funds are received and invested by the board acting as trustees for the trust, as well as the manner in which the real property may be conveyed to the trust for burial purposes to be irrevocably committed to the use for which it is conveyed. Unless the trust document otherwise provides, investments of the trust funds shall be essentially the same as those authorized for the investment of trust funds in accordance with title 35, chapter 3.

Acts 1989, ch. 222, § 3.

46-7-104. Purpose of trust — Expenditures for perpetual care.

Any trust created for the perpetual care of a private cemetery to be administered by a trust corporation formed under this chapter shall be a charitable trust for the general welfare of the citizens of the state. The board of directors of the trust corporation shall establish guidelines for disbursement that are not inconsistent with this chapter or the trust document under which it operates as trustee for the trust.

The corpus and income from the investment of the trust for the perpetual care of a private cemetery shall be expended solely for the purpose of providing perpetual care in accordance with this chapter and the respective trust agreement, except that reasonable expenses for administration of the trust may be deducted from the income.

Acts 1989, ch. 222, § 4.

46-7-105. Contributions — Gifts of land.

Any person, association, or corporation may make contributions to the trust corporation for the benefit of the trust pursuant to this chapter, and the trust corporation is authorized to accept funds and deposit the funds in the trust. In addition, the trust corporation is authorized to accept gifts of land for the benefit of the trust as provided in this chapter. Gifts of land shall be made in the name of the trust corporation with appropriate language of limitation.

Acts 1989, ch. 222, § 5.